Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3803
Early identification; department; duties.

The department, in conjunction with the appropriate consulate, shall provide a method of early identification of foreign national minors and minors having multiple nationalities and their families in order to provide services which assure all the protections afforded by all applicable treaties and laws.

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB92, § 3.